Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2107
Review of adverse decision.

A student or the student's parent or legal guardian may request in writing a review of any adverse decision by requesting such review within twenty days following notice of the adverse decision, addressed to the executive director of the commission. The review shall be pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2007, LB192, § 8.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.